Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 15.3 Public Drinking Water Supply System Protection

46-15.3-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be referred to as the “Public Drinking Water Supply System Protection Act of 1997”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 2.

46-15.3-1.1.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby recognizes and declares that:

Water is vital to life and comprises an invaluable natural resource which is not to be abused by any segment of the state’s population or its economy. It is the policy of this state to restore, enhance, and maintain the chemical, physical, and biological integrity of its waters to protect public health;

That Rhode Island has abundant supplies of surface and groundwater and an average level of precipitation adequate to replenish these supplies under normal conditions, and that these supplies are sufficient in quantity and quality to meet the present needs of the people and economy of this state, but that sources of drinking water are not always located where they are needed, are subject to contamination making them unfit for drinking purposes, may be used for purposes not requiring water suitable for drinking, and may not be adequate to meet all future needs;

The waters of this state are a critical renewable resource which must be protected to insure the availability of safe and potable drinking water for present and future needs;

That systematic management of the state’s drinking water supplies is essential to the proper conservation, development, utilization, and protection of this finite natural resource, if the present and future needs of the state are to be met on a continuing and sustainable basis;

It is a paramount policy of the state to protect the purity of present and future drinking water supplies by protecting aquifers, recharge areas, and watersheds;

It is the policy of the state to restore and maintain the quality of its waters to a quality consistent with its use for drinking supplies and other designated beneficial uses without treatment as feasible;

Development of land areas near to supplies of drinking water and related construction can threaten the quality of those supplies and, therefore, can endanger public health; thus it is necessary to take immediate and continuing steps to protect the watersheds of surface waters and the reservoirs and recharge areas of ground waters from land uses and activities which may degrade the quality of public drinking water;

Protection of water quality is necessary from the collection source through the point of delivery to the ultimate consumer;

That the objectives of this chapter are:

To insure that water supply system management plans are prepared, maintained, and carried out by each municipality and by each municipal department, agency, district, authority, or other entity engaged in or authorized to engage in the supply, treatment, transmission, or distribution of drinking water, and

That the said plans and their execution achieve the effective and efficient conservation, development, utilization, and protection of this finite natural resource in ways that meet the present and future needs of the state and its people.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 51.

46-15.3-2.
Designation of water resources board — Selection of treasurer.

Except as specified in §

46-15.3-9

, the water resources board is designated to carry out the provisions of this chapter in its capacity as designated in §

46-15.1-2

. In exercising its powers under this chapter, the board shall constitute a body politic and corporate and a public instrumentality of the state having a distinct legal existence from the state and not constituting a department of the state government, but this shall not affect the status of the board when exercising other powers. The board may take action under this chapter at any meeting of the board. A member of the board who is affiliated with a public water system in Rhode Island as provided in §

46-15-2

shall not thereby be disqualified from acting as a member of the board on a transaction under this chapter with the public water system.

The treasurer, chosen pursuant to §

46-15.1-2

, shall act as such under this chapter. If a treasurer has not been chosen by the board pursuant to §

46-15.1-2

, the board shall at any time, and annually in the month of March thereafter, choose a treasurer to act as such under this chapter. The treasurer need not be a member of the board or of its staff and shall serve until his or her successor is chosen and taken office, unless sooner removed by the board with or without cause. In the event of a vacancy in the office of treasurer, the board shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 51.

46-15.3-3.
Purposes and powers.

The purposes of the board and the suppliers under this chapter shall be to protect the quality and safety of the public drinking water supply. In carrying out the foregoing purposes the board shall have, in addition to the powers granted in this chapter, all of the powers enumerated in chapter 15.1 of this title, and shall have the power to acquire interests in land in the manner provided in §

46-15.1-5

, but in exercising these powers, the board shall not be subject to any limitation on the use of funds contained in §

46-15.1-19

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 8.

46-15.3-4.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings, unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning or intent:

“Aquifer” means a geologic formation, group of formations, or part of a formation capable of yielding a significant amount of groundwater to wells, springs, or surface water.

“Commercial agricultural producers” means purveyors of at least two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) of agricultural products during a calendar year.

“Eligible expenditure” means the acquisition of a fee simple interest or of a conservation restriction, as that term is defined in §

34-39-2(a)

, or other interest in watershed lands, including, but not limited to, costs and expenses relating to the improvement of the lands or interests therein, maintenance of the lands or roads or interests therein, and taxes thereon, or the funding of the construction of physical improvements that directly protect the quality and safety of public drinking water supply. No funds under this section shall be used to extend service lines or expand system capacity.

“Ground water” means water found underground which completely fills the open spaces between particles of sand, gravel, clay, silt, and consolidated rock fractures. The zone of materials filled with groundwater is called the zone of saturation.

“Ground water recharge” means the processes of addition of water to the zone of saturation, that zone beneath the water table.

“Raw water” means water in its natural state prior to any treatment.

“Recharge area” means an area in which water is absorbed that eventually reaches the zone of saturation.

“Sale” means all retail sales of potable water to end users for any purpose in the ordinary course of business by a supplier, except for sales exempt pursuant to §

46-15.3-5(c)

, (d) and (e).

“Source” means the raw water upon which a public water supply system abounds, and refers to both groundwater and surface water.

“Supplier(s) of public drinking water” and “supplier(s) mean any city, town, district, or other municipal, quasi municipal, or public or private corporation or company engaged in the sale of potable water and the water supply business in Rhode Island; provided, however, that only suppliers which withdraw water from wells, reservoirs, springs, or other original sources in potable quality shall be entitled to disbursements pursuant to §

46-15.3-11

.

“The fund” means the water quality protection funds as described in §

46-15.3-10

.

“Watersheds” means those land areas which, because of their topography, soil type, and drainage patterns, act as collectors of raw waters which replenish or regorge existing or planned public drinking water supplies.

“Non-billed water” means the difference between water produced by a supplier and water sold by the same supplier.

“Leakage” means the difference between non-billed water and the total of the estimated or measured allowances for fire fighting, meter inaccuracy, theft, system usage, main flushing, sewer cleaning, storm drain cleaning, and other allowances that may be developed by the water resources board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 411, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 472, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 468, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 25, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 38; P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 8; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 8.

46-15.3-5.
Water quality protection charge.

There is hereby imposed on each supplier of water, for the purpose of protecting the quality and safety of the public supply of water, a charge to be known as a “water quality protection charge” based upon billings for sales of every supplier of public drinking water at the rate of two and ninety two hundredth cents ($.0292) per one hundred (100) gallons of each sale, whether the water is used for drinking or other purposes. No supplier shall impose a water quality protection charge upon sales to other suppliers of drinking water. Except as provided in subsections (c), (d) and (e) hereof, the supplier shall add any water quality protection charge imposed hereunder to the sale price, and, when added, the water quality protection charge shall constitute a part of the price and shall also be a debt from the purchaser to the supplier and be collectible in the same manner and have the benefit of any lien provided for the amounts due for water charges from the purchaser to the supplier. Provided, however, the water quality protection charge shall not be subject to the sales and use tax. Subject to the provisions of §

39-1.1-1

for those suppliers which are public utilities, all suppliers may terminate service for failure of purchasers to pay the water quality protection charge.

Any water quality protection charge imposed hereunder shall not take effect earlier than January 1, 1989; provided, however, the increase in water quality protection charge by one and one-third cents ($0.01333) established by P.L. 1990, Ch. 65, Art. 39, § 1 shall take effect and be chargeable on all billings for water sales made by a supplier on and after July 1, 1991.

Each supplier shall provide for the exemption from the water quality protection charge, for any sale to a purchaser sixty-five (65) years of age and over purchasing water for the personal consumption of that person and other members of the person’s household under reasonable rules and regulations.

All commercial agricultural producers, including those who provide food and fiber, shall be exempt for that amount of water used to irrigate commercial crops either in fields or greenhouses, provided, that the producers have a conservation plan on file with their respective soil conservation districts.

No water quality protection charge shall be imposed on that portion of such supplier’s retail billing representing potable water furnished to customers by purchase of water in its finished, potable form from sources outside the state. The water quality protection charge imposed by a supplier purchasing potable water from outside the state shall be pro rata imposed on such supplier’s retail billings for that portion of potable water supplied from within the state in accordance with rules and regulations to be finally promulgated by the water resources board on or before September 1, 1992.

If any supplier of water fails to pay the water quality protection charge imposed upon it, upon determination by the water resources board of failure to pay and the amount unpaid, there shall be withheld from any state aid or grants of any nature due such supplier an equivalent amount and such monies shall be transferred to the appropriate water quality protection fund created under §

46-15.3-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 411, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 39, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 468, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 13.

46-15.3-5.1.
Water supply systems management plans.

All parties involved in the supply, transmission, and/or distribution of drinking water shall prepare, maintain, and carry out a water supply system management plan as described by this chapter. This requirement applies, without limitations, to:

All municipalities subject to chapter 22.2 of title 45, the Comprehensive Planning and Land Use Regulation Act. The executive summary of the water supply system management plan including the demand management goals and plans for water conservation and efficient use of water, of any water supplier providing service in any municipality, shall be incorporated in the services and facilities element of the plan for that municipality required by § 45-22.2-6(6);

All municipalities, municipal departments and agencies, districts, authorities or other entities engaged in or authorized to engage in the supply, treatment, transmission, or distribution of drinking water on a wholesale or retail basis, referred to herein as “water suppliers,” which obtain, transport, purchase, or sell more than fifty million (50,000,000) gallons of water per year.

A water supply system management plan shall be prepared in the format, and shall address each of the topics, listed in this section, to the extent that each is relevant to the municipality or water supplier, the water source(s), the water system(s), and the area served or eligible to be served. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, water supply management plans shall be in conformity with all applicable provisions of the Federal Safe Drinking Water Act [42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq.], chapter 13 of this title, Public Drinking Water Supply, and chapter 14 of this title, Contamination of Drinking Water, as administered by the department of health. Any other topic of interest may be included.

A water supply system management plan shall include, without limitation, the following components:

The water supply management component of the water supply system management plan shall include, without limitation:

A statement of the goals that the plan is designed to achieve, including, but not limited to, goals for:

Water resource protection;

Demand management, which shall include goals as appropriate for managing peak and seasonal use of water; and

Supply development as necessary and with consideration of source water availability; and

System management, including system safety and reliability, infrastructure maintenance, repair, and reduction of leakage.

A description of the water system(s) covered, including sources of water, the service area, present and anticipated future users, and other important characteristics;

Data collection in a form that can be accepted directly into the Rhode Island Geographic Information System;

Demand management measures that will achieve a high level of efficiency in the use of a limited resource, through the application of metering of one hundred percent (100%) of the water used; sanitary device retrofit; performance of and compliance with water use audits for major industrial, commercial, institutional, governmental, agricultural and other outdoor water users; education and information; and use of appropriate fees, rates, and charges to influence use demand management measures shall include such restrictions on use; as may be necessary to meet or exceed targets for water use, including seasonal use, that are established by the water resources board; and the water resources board is hereby expressly directed and authorized to establish and maintain no later than July 31, 2010, by rule targets for water use and methods for achieving the targets, which shall as appropriate take into account differing conditions among watershed and water supply areas;

System management measures to insure that the following elements are optimally operated and maintained, including: leak detection and repair; meter installation and replacement; and frequency of reading meters. Maintenance or reduction of leakage to stated goals shall be considered an essential component of system management;

Supply management measures to insure present and future availability of drinking water in adequate quantity and quality, including protection of the capacity and quality of drinking water sources; retaining water sources for standby or future use that are or can be improved to drinking water quality; reactivation of any water sources not in use; interconnection of systems for ongoing, standby, or emergency use; supply augmentation;

Emergency management, including risk assessment; responses to temporary or permanent loss of supplies due to natural or manmade causes; extraordinary treatment processes; interruptions in the delivery system; and contamination of water sources or delivery systems;

The water supply system management plans of water suppliers shall document that coordination has been accomplished with those plans of other suppliers in the vicinity and with operators of wastewater treatment and disposal facilities serving all or part of the same area or that a good faith effort to do so has been made. Plans shall be consistent with applicable local comprehensive plans and shall be integrated into the water supply plans of the municipality or municipalities in which the service area is or is planned to be located. Conversely, the local comprehensive plans shall be consistent with water supply plans;

Water supply system management plans shall designate the person or organization responsible for taking each action, others who must participate, and the time period in which each action is to be taken. The capital, operating, and maintenance cost (if any) of each action shall be estimated and the anticipated source of funds shall be identified;

Water suppliers subject to this chapter shall utilize methods to implement management measures necessary to achieve the findings, intent, and objectives of this chapter. The water supplier may be required to document the validity or effectiveness of any management measure, implementation method, or other provision or action included in its plan.

The water quality protection component of the water supply system management plan shall include, without limitations, those items enumerated in §

46-15.3-7

.

The leak detection and repair component of the water supply system management plan shall include, without limitation:

Methodology for leak detection;

Detailed program for the conducting of required repairs to the water supply system;

Impact assessment studies on the ability of the supplier to provide for peak demand services;

A priority list of actions for implementing these management measures;

Every supplier of public water encompassed under this section shall conduct periodic leak detection consistent with stated goals for leakage, however no less frequently than once every ten (10) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 484, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 8; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 8.

46-15.3-6.
Repealed.

46-15.3-7.
Water quality protection component.

Every supplier of public water eligible for trust fund proceeds under this chapter shall, by July 1, 1988, complete a water quality protection component which shall at a minimum include:

Determination of the boundaries of the watersheds of reservoirs serving the supplier or of the aquifers serving public wells.

Identification of sources of contamination of each reservoir or well field.

Identification of measures needed to protect each reservoir or well field from sources of contamination, including acquisition of buffer zones, diversion of storm water or spills, and desirable land use control regulations.

A priority list of actions for implementing these protection measures.

This component shall be adopted by the governing board of each water supplier following a public hearing. Notice of the public hearing shall be published once by the supplier at least twenty (20) days before the date set thereof, in a newspaper of general circulation in the State of Rhode Island. The notice shall set forth the date, time, and place of the hearing and shall include a brief description of the matter to be considered at the hearing. The component shall be updated at least once every five (5) years. Proceeds from the watershed protection fund shall be usable for reimbursement of suppliers for preparation of water quality protection plans.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 468, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 2.

46-15.3-7.3.
Rules governing content of programs, components, review, evaluation, funding, and implementation.

The water resources board with the concurrence of the department of environmental management, the department of health, the department of administration’s division of planning, and the Rhode Island public utilities commission, as to water suppliers within its jurisdiction, shall forthwith promulgate rules and regulations for the review of components as described in this chapter. The water resources board with the concurrence of the department of environmental management, the department of health, the department of administration’s statewide planning program, and the Rhode Island public utilities commission, as to water suppliers within its jurisdiction, shall promulgate the criteria or standards which it will use to evaluate the implementation of approved components, programs and funding mechanisms.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 3.

46-15.3-7.4.
Excluding requirement of state mandated cost.

The provisions of §§

45-13-7

through

45-13-10

inclusive, shall not apply to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 3.

46-15.3-7.5.
Completion and filing of water supply system management plans.

Each party required by this chapter to prepare and maintain a water supply system management plan shall complete and adopt an initial plan adhering to the schedule as previously approved by the water resources board.

Municipalities and water suppliers subject to the requirements of §

46-15.3-5.1

of this chapter shall file a copy of all plans and amendments thereto with the water resources board. The plans shall be treated as confidential documents.

The water resources board shall establish procedures that permit parties that review the plans under rules adopted by the water resources board to obtain sensitive information essential to performance of their reviews, including minimum measures necessary to transmit, use, store, and maintain such sensitive information under conditions that insure its security to the maximum possible. These procedures may include designation of those persons within each reviewing agency authorized to use or inspect sensitive information, and exclusion of all others. An executive summary containing an:

Introduction;

Background;

A general system description containing:

Water supply sources;

Water treatment facilities;

Storage facilities;

Pumping stations;

Raw water and finished water transmission facilities;

Distribution facilities including low to high service;

Planned extensions;

Interconnections;

Populations served and projections;

Major users;

Metering;

Legal agreements;

Leakage;

Demand management;

Supply management;

Available water;

Safe yield;

Anticipated future demands;

Capital improvement;

Rate structure;

Financial management;

Emergency management;

Water supply source protection; and

General policies shall be developed.

This summary shall be distributed as the public document. The water resources board shall be authorized to recover and secure water supply management plans and water supply system management plans previously distributed to other than water resources board and designated review agencies and replaced by executive summaries as provided herein.

Municipalities and water suppliers subject to §

46-15.3-5.1

shall review their plans at least once every five (5) years, and shall amend or replace their plan as may be necessary to remain current.

A municipality or water supplier subject to §

46-15.3-5.1

of this chapter may request, in writing, that the water resources board extend the time in which to complete and submit filings required by this chapter, not to exceed one year. A request shall be approved only upon demonstration that an extension is justified by extraordinary circumstances beyond the control of the municipality or water supplier. An extension, if approved, shall not waive any of the requirements of §

46-15.3-7.6

. This provision does not apply to the section on emergency management. Should a municipality or water supplier fail to submit a filing as provided herein, a determination of non-compliance shall be made by the water resources board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 51; P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 8; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 8.

46-15.3-7.6.
Expeditious review of water supply system management plans.

The water resources board shall coordinate the expeditious review of water supply system management plans, replacements and amendments thereto prepared by water suppliers and all other subject to §

46-15.3-5.1

of this chapter.

Upon filing of water supply system management plans, replacements and amendments thereto prepared by water suppliers under this chapter the department of environmental management, the department of health, the division of planning of the department of administration, and the division of public utilities and carriers, shall have ninety (90) days to review said filings and submit comments thereon to the water resources board.

Upon consideration of written comments by all agencies designated herein the water resources board shall determine whether the plan complies with the requirements of this chapter. Should any reviewing agency find that substantive deficiencies prevent the water supply system management plan from meeting the requirements of this chapter, a determination of noncompliance shall be made by the water resources board. This determination, unless otherwise extended pursuant to this chapter, shall be made within one hundred eighty (180) days of the initial submission. A thirty (30) day public comment period shall be included in this one hundred eighty (180) day review period. Failure by the water resources board to notify the water supplier or municipality of its determination within said time limit shall constitute approval.

Should the water resources board find that the water supply system management plan is in noncompliance, or deficient due to incorrect, inconsistent or missing data or information but is in substantial compliance with the objectives of this chapter, the water resources board shall issue a first notice of deficiencies. The water supplier or municipality shall have one hundred and twenty (120) days within which to correct the deficiencies and resubmit its filing addressing the comments of the water resources board. Thereafter the water resources board shall have ninety (90) days from the date of the resubmission to determine whether or not the new submission is in compliance with this chapter. Failure by the water resources board to notify the water supplier of its determination, in writing within ninety (90) days of the date of resubmission shall constitute acknowledgement of compliance.

Upon the submission of plans or plan amendments prior to the scheduled submittal date, as established by the water resources board, the scheduled submittal date may be used for purposes of initiating the one hundred eighty (180) day review period. The time period for review of water supply system management plans, replacements, or amendments thereto submitted after the scheduled submittal date, shall be as determined by the water resources board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 51.

46-15.3-7.7.
Water suppliers — Temporary exemption.

Those water suppliers, and all others subject to the provisions of this chapter, who, at the time that this chapter takes effect, have in process the development of a water supply management plan, or component thereof, as required under any provision of the general laws, shall be temporarily exempt from having to comply with this chapter, for a period of five (5) years following the submission of a water supply management plan required under other provisions of the general laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 360, § 3.

46-15.3-8.
Notice of imposition of charge — Actions to contest validity.

Notice of the imposition of the water quality protection charge shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the state of Rhode Island at some time subsequent to the imposition of the water quality protection charge. Actions to contest the validity of the proceedings for the imposition of the water quality protection charge must be commenced within sixty (60) days after the date of the notice, and no action thereafter commenced shall raise any question concerning the validity of the proceedings and imposition of the water quality protection charge. After the expiration of the period of sixty (60) days, the validity of the proceedings and the imposition of the water quality protection charge shall be conclusively presumed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1.

46-15.3-9.
Collection of charges.

A record shall be maintained by every supplier showing the amounts of water sold, and the amounts of water quality protection charges billed. The records shall be subject to public review. The water quality protection charges shall be deemed to be trust funds for the purposes of this chapter and shall be held in a separate account.

For all suppliers, other than the city of Providence acting through the Providence water supply board, or suppliers purchasing water from the city of Providence acting through the Providence water supply board, thirty-six and one tenth percent (36.1%) of the amount billed each month shall be remitted to the treasurer of the water resources board on or before the twentieth (20th) day of the second month following the month of billing.

For suppliers purchasing water from the city of Providence acting through the Providence water supply board, for that portion of such supplier’s retail billings representing water furnished to the purchasers from the Providence water supply board, thirty-six and one tenth percent (36.1%) of the amount billed each month shall be remitted to the Providence water supply board, on or before the twentieth (20th) day of the second month following the month of billing, and for that portion of such supplier’s retail billings representing water furnished to the purchasers from sources other than the Providence water supply board, thirty-six and one tenth percent (36.1%) of the amount billed each month shall be remitted to the treasurer of the water resources board on or before the twentieth (20th) day of the second month following the month of billing.

The amounts remitted by suppliers purchasing water from the city of Providence to the Providence water supply board and treasurer of the water resources board pursuant to the previous sentence shall be based pro rata on metered water production originating from the Providence water supply board and from all other sources in accordance with rules and regulations to be finally promulgated by the water resources board on or before September 1, 1992.

For all suppliers, including the city of Providence acting through the Providence water supply board, fifty-seven percent (57.0%) of the amount billed each month shall be remitted through the water resources board to the general treasurer of the state of Rhode Island on or before the twentieth (20th) day of the second month following the month of billing and shall be deposited as general revenues.

All suppliers may disburse the six and nine tenths percent (6.9%) of the charges collected and retained by the supplier as an administrative charge for any purpose relating to the operation of the supplier. All suppliers shall use or pledge the thirty-six and one tenth percent (36.1%) of the charges to pay principal or interest on bonds, notes, or other obligations issued for the purposes of this chapter or lease payments in connection with any bonds, notes, or obligations. It shall not be necessary for any supplier of public drinking water whose rates may be regulated by the public utilities commission, pursuant to chapter 1 of title 39, to obtain approval from the commission for billing of the water quality protection charge. The public utilities commission shall not, in determining rates for any supplier hereunder, consider the funds billed hereunder when determining revenue requirements for the supplier.

In no event shall any supplier be responsible to collect or pay more than a single water quality protection charge with respect to water sold by such supplier, whether the date of sale was on, before, or after July 1, 1992.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 39, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 468, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 160; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 13; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 51.

46-15.3-10.
Water quality protection funds.

There are hereby created three (3) water quality protection funds: one of which shall be administered by and be in the custody of the treasurer of the water resources board, one of which shall be administered by and be in the custody of the city of Providence acting through the Providence water supply board, and one of which shall be in the custody of the general treasurer. The first two (2) mentioned funds shall consist of such amounts as the state or the city of Providence may from time to time appropriate, all water quality protection charges other than the six and nine tenths percent (6.9%) and fifty-seven percent (57.0%) portions referred to in §

46-15.3-9

, proceeds from the sale of bonds and notes, as provided in subsection (b) below, and any money which may have been obtained as grants, bequests, donations, gifts, or fines which are intended to be used for purposes consistent with this chapter. This third mentioned fund shall be hereby established as a general revenue receipt account known as the “water resources operating fund”.

The general revenue appropriations made available from the general revenue receipts credited to “Water Resources Operating Fund” shall be used for the administration and support of the water resources board.

The water resources board shall borrow money and issue its notes and bonds therefor, for the purposes set forth in this chapter, and pursuant to the authority and the procedures set forth in chapter 15.1 of this title, which shall be secured by pledging or assigning, in whole or in part, the revenues and other monies held or to be deposited in the water quality protection funds and any other revenues derived under this chapter.

Any supplier with its own water quality protection fund may borrow money, and/or issue its bonds or notes therefor, or may lease public facilities or public equipment for the purposes set forth in this chapter. The supplier must secure any borrowings, bonds, notes, or leases by pledging or assigning, in whole or in part, the revenues and other monies held by it in its own water quality protection fund.

All amounts in the water quality protection fund, water quality protection charges, and any other revenues of the water resources board, excluding those deposited as general revenues, received under the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter and chapter 15.1 of this title.

Any money which may accumulate in the water quality protection funds, which is in excess of that pledged to repayment of outstanding bonds or notes or lease payments or loan repayments at any given time, may be used directly for eligible expenditures from the fund and shall be disbursed for these purposes in accordance with §

46-15.3-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 39, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 19, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 468, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 160; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 13.